dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
    <pardef n="men/a__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ats</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>at</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>at</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ats</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ad</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>d</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ads</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ds</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ade</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ades</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ade</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>de</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ades</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>des</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ade</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ades</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ade</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ades</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ades</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ade</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>te</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ande</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>andes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sn/ika__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>ikas</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ika</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikits</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikit</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ika</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eks</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iktes</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ek</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikte</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ekes</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eke</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikande</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikandes</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikas</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iker</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikes</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ike</l><r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="mena"><i>men</i><par n="men/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tjusa"><i>tjus</i><par n="men/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utbetala"><i>utbetal</i><par n="men/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="återbetala"><i>återbetal</i><par n="men/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="snika"><i>sn</i><par n="sn/ika__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inbetala"><i>inbetal</i><par n="men/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förmena"><i>förmen</i><par n="men/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tala"><i>tal</i><par n="men/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="betala"><i>betal</i><par n="men/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="underbetala"><i>underbetal</i><par n="men/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spela"><i>spel</i><par n="men/a__vblex"/></e>
